Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 10. Judicial Proceedings

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-1001.
Role of court in administration.

The court may intervene in the administration of a statutory foundation only to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked as provided in this act or as otherwise provided by law.

A statutory foundation is not subject to continuing judicial supervision unless ordered by a court.

A civil proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed decision or transaction of a statutory foundation may be commenced by the board of directors of the foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-1002.
Power of court to give directions.

Upon application to the court by a founder, protector or statutory foundation, the court may issue a declaratory judgment regarding the following:

The meaning and effect of a provision in the articles of formation or operating agreement of the foundation;

The administration of the property or purpose of the foundation;

The function of the board of directors of the foundation;

Such other matters as determined by the court to be relevant to the statutory foundation and its purpose.

If there is no express power to amend the purpose of a statutory foundation in the articles of formation, then a founder or the protector may apply to a court for an order to amend the purpose stated in the articles of formation in accordance with the probable intent of the founder and subject to the following:

The purpose stated in the articles of formation has been fulfilled;

The purpose stated in the articles of formation cannot be carried out in accordance with the intent of the founder;

The purpose stated in the articles of formation provides a use for only part of the property of the foundation;

The purpose stated in the articles of formation cannot be completed or no longer exists.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

in (b), deleted “of the foundation” preceding “then a founder,” substituted “and subject to” for “, based on one (1) of” and deleted “grounds” at the end.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-1003.
Sealing and availability of documents.

Except for information that is otherwise publicly available, the privacy of persons who have organized a statutory foundation shall be protected in any judicial proceeding. A filed document or court order issued concerning a statutory foundation shall be sealed and shall not be made a part of the public record of the proceeding except as otherwise required by law. A filed document or court order issued shall be available to the court, a founder, the board of directors, a protector, the attorney of any of the persons specified in this section and any other interested person as the court may order upon a showing of need.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.